District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.12

Annual anti-fraud activity reporting requirement.

Each insurer and health maintenance organization licensed in the District shall file an annual anti-fraud activity report on March 31st of each year with the Commissioner, which shall contain information about the special investigation unit’s insurance fraud activities during the preceding calendar year. Annual anti-fraud activity reports filed with the Commissioner shall be kept confidential and shall not be subject to the disclosure requirements of subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125ll
as added Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-254, § 2(d), 50 DCR 233